Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2604
Athlete agent; registration required;
void contracts.

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, an individual
may not act as an athlete agent in this state without holding a certificate
of registration under section 48-2606 or 48-2608.

(2) Before being issued
a certificate of registration, an individual may act as an athlete agent in
this state for all purposes except signing an agency contract if:

(a) A student-athlete
or another person acting on behalf of the student-athlete initiates communication
with the individual; and

(b)
Within seven days after an initial act as an athlete agent, the individual
submits an application for registration as an athlete agent in this state.

(3) An agency contract
resulting from conduct in violation of this section is void, and the athlete
agent shall return any consideration received under the contract.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 4.